District of Columbia statutes.
4-632

Establishment of Healthy DC Program; administration.

(a)

There is established the Healthy DC Program (“Program”), which shall provide affordable health benefits to eligible individuals.

(b)

The Program shall be administered by the Department of Health Care Finance, established by Chapter 7D of Title 7.

(c)

The Program shall be funded through the Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund, established by § 31-3514.02.

(d)

(1)

The Program shall be subject to the availability of funding.

(2)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create or constitute an entitlement to health insurance or health or medical benefits.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5042, 55 DCR 7598
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5025(a), 57 DCR 6242
D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (c), substituted “Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund” for “Healthy DC Fund”.
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 18-205, in subsec. (c), substituted “Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund” for “Healthy DC Fund”.
Section 7(b) of D.C. Law 18-205 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 18-270, in subsec. (a), substituted “health benefits or premium subsidies for employer-sponsored coverage” for “health benefits”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-270 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5(a) of Medicaid Resource Maximization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-390, May 7, 2010, 57 DCR 4339).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Healthy DC Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-528, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 8095).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5025(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Healthy DC Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-569, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10082).